Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1155.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Community Solar Act.Section 2. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Growth in solar generation provides family-sustaining jobs and investments in this Commonwealth.(2) Programs for community solar generation provide customers with additional energy choices and access to affordable energy options.(3) Community solar programs provide customers, including homeowners, renters and businesses, access to the benefits of Pennsylvania community solar energy generation that is unconstrained by the physical attributes of their home or business, including roof space, shading or ownership status.(4) In addition to its provision of standard electricity market commodities and services, local solar energy generation can contribute to a more resilient grid and defer the need for costly new transmission and distribution system 20250HB1155PN1279 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investment.(5) The intent of this act is to:(i) Allow electric distribution customers of this Commonwealth to subscribe to a portion of a community solar facility and have the result of the subscription be guaranteed savings.(ii) Reasonably allow for the creation, financing, accessibility and operation of third-party-owned community solar generating facilities and enable robust customer participation.(iii) Encourage the development of community solar programs that facilitate participation by and for accessibility and operation of third-party-owned community solar generating facilities and enable robust customer participation.(iv) Encourage the development of community solar programs that facilitate participation by and for the benefit of low-income and moderate-income customers and the communities where they live, reduce barriers to participation by renters and small businesses, promote affordability and improve access to basic public utility services.(v) Maximize the use of Federal money to provide for the development of community solar programs.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bill credit." The commission-approved monetary value of each kilowatt hour of electricity generated by a community solar 20250HB1155PN1279 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility and allocated to a subscriber's monthly bill to offset any part of the subscriber's retail electric bill other than volumetric or demand-based distribution charges."Brownfield." Real property, the expansion, redevelopment or reuse of which may be complicated by the presence or potential presence of a hazardous substance, pollutant or contaminant."Brownfield or rooftop community solar facility." A community solar facility that is primarily located on rooftops or land that is a brownfield."Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Community solar facility." A facility that meets all of the following criteria:(1) Is located within this Commonwealth.(2) Is connected to and delivers electricity to a distribution system operated by an electric distribution company operating in this Commonwealth and in compliance with requirements under this act.(3) Generates electricity by means of a solar photovoltaic device with a nameplate capacity rating that does not exceed:(i) 5,000 kilowatts of alternating current for a facility that is not a brownfield or rooftop community solar facility; and(ii) 20,000 kilowatts of alternating current for a facility that is a brownfield or rooftop community solar facility.(4) Has no single subscriber who subscribes to more than 50% of the facility capacity in kilowatts or output in kilowatt hours, except for a master-metered multifamily residential or commercial building.20250HB1155PN1279 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Has no less than 50% of the facility capacity subscribed by subscriptions of 25 kilowatts or less.(6) Credits some or all of the facility-generated electricity to the bills of subscribers.(7) May be located remotely from a subscriber's premises and is not required to provide energy to on-site load.(8) Is owned or operated by a community solar organization.(9) Delivers the amount of energy and capacity that is contracted by each customer."Community solar organization." As follows:(1) An entity that owns or operates a community solar facility and is not required to:(i) be an existing retail electric customer;(ii) purchase electricity directly from the electric distribution company;(iii) serve electric load independent of the community solar facility; or(iv) operate under an account held by the same individual or legal entity of the subscribers to the community solar facility.(2) For the purpose of this definition, a community solar organization shall not be deemed a public utility solely as a result of the organization's ownership or operation of a community solar facility."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Electric distribution company." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803 (relating to definitions)."Electric distribution customer." A customer that takes 20250HB1155PN1279 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electric distribution service from an electric distribution company, regardless of whether the company is the customer's supplier of electric generation or not."Guaranteed savings." Realized savings by a subscriber from a community solar organization manifested as the difference between the cost of a subscription paid to a community solar facility and the credit received on the subscriber's electric bill for the generation attributed to the subscription."Initial and replacement subscribers." Each subscriber to a single community solar facility over the life of the facility."Low-income." A family income at or below 150% of the poverty line as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 9902(2) (relating to definitions) based on the size of the family."Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act." The act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act."Public utility." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Subscriber." An electric distribution customer of an electric distribution company who contracts for a subscription of a community solar facility interconnected with the customer's electric distribution company. The term includes an electric distribution customer who owns a portion of a community solar facility."Subscriber administrator." An entity that recruits and enrolls a subscriber, administers subscriber participation in a community solar facility and manages the subscription relationship between subscribers and an electric distribution company. The term includes a community solar organization. For the purpose of this definition, a subscriber administrator 20250HB1155PN1279 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall not be considered a public utility solely as a result of the subscriber administrator's operation or ownership of a community solar facility."Subscription." A contract between a subscriber and a subscriber administrator of a community solar facility that entitles the subscriber to a bill credit, measured in kilowatt hours, and applied against the subscriber's retail electric bill."Unsubscribed energy." The output of a community solar facility, measured in kilowatt hours, that is not allocated to subscribers.Section 4. Authorization to own or operate community solar facilities.A community solar organization or subscriber administrator may develop, build, own or operate a community solar facility. A community solar organization may serve as a subscriber administrator or may contract with a third party to serve as a subscriber administrator on behalf of the community solar organization. Renewable energy credits that are associated with the generation of electricity by a community solar facility shall be the property of the community solar organization and may be retired or transferred by the community solar organization or retired on behalf of the subscribers.Section 5. Bill credit for subscribers to community solar facilities.(a) Credit.--A subscriber to a community solar facility shall receive a monetary bill credit for every kilowatt hour produced by the subscriber's subscription. A community solar facility that demonstrates all of the following to the commission shall have the initial and replacement subscribers of 20250HB1155PN1279 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the community solar facility receive a bill credit from the date the community solar facility is authorized by the commission to operate:(1) An executed interconnection agreement with an electric distribution company obtained in accordance with 52 Pa. Code Ch. 75 (relating to alternative energy portfolio standards).(2) Proof of site control.(3) The required nonministerial permits.(4) Proof that the community solar facility will be at least 50% subscribed on the date the community solar facility receives permission to operate.(5) A signed agreement for a commission-approved workforce development requirement.(6) Proof that the community solar facility is constructed or, if not yet constructed, an attestation that the community solar facility will be in compliance with section 13.(7) A community solar organization or subscriber administrator will not bill a subscriber for services provided by an electric distribution company. An electric distribution company may not bill a subscriber for subscription costs to a community solar organization.(b) Establishment of credit.--Within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, the commission shall establish a bill credit for a public utility that appropriately values the energy, capacity and transmission values produced by a community solar facility and is not less than the price to compare. The terms and conditions of receiving the bill credit may not limit or inhibit participation of subscribers from any 20250HB1155PN1279 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rate class.Section 6. Protection for customers.(a) Customer protection provisions.--The commission shall promulgate regulations providing for the protection of a residential customer who has a subscription with a community solar organization or subscriber administrator.(b) Standardized customer disclosure form.--The commission shall develop a standardized customer disclosure form in English and Spanish for a residential customer that identifies key information that is required to be provided by a subscriber administrator to a potential residential subscriber, including future costs and benefits of a subscription and the subscriber's rights and obligations pertaining to a subscription.(c) Subscription costs.--The subscription costs for a subscriber shall be less than the value of the bill credit and may not include any upfront or sign-on fees or credit checks. The subscription costs shall be nonbasic public utility charges. Failure to pay a subscription may result in the loss of a subscription but shall not impact public utility services.(d) Benefits and costs.--The commission shall maximize benefits and minimize costs to each rate class, notwithstanding participation in a community solar program.(e) Fees prohibited.--A community solar organization may not impose a termination or cancellation fee on a subscriber.(f) Net crediting.--An electric distribution company shall enter into a net crediting agreement with a community solar organization to include a subscriber's subscription fee on a monthly bill and provide a customer with a net credit equivalent to the total bill credit value for the generation period minus the subscription fee. The net crediting agreement shall specify 20250HB1155PN1279 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 payment terms from the electric distribution company to the community solar organization. The electric distribution company may charge a net crediting fee to the community solar organization that may not exceed 1% of the bill credit value. A nonresidential customer may subscribe to multiple community solar facilities, except that no more than one of the subscriptions may be under a net credit agreement with an electric distribution company. The electric distribution company shall continue to have the duty for billing all basic electric services, including transmission, distribution and generation charges, consistent in accordance with this act and regulations promulgated by the commission. The electric distribution company shall also continue to maintain customer services, at a minimum, consistent with existing standards prior to the implementation of a net crediting agreement with a community solar organization in accordance with this act and regulations promulgated by the commission.Section 7. Duties of electric distribution companies.(a) Report on bill credit.--On a monthly basis, an electric distribution company shall provide to a community solar organization or subscriber administrator a report in a standardized electronic format indicating the total value of the bill credit generated by the community solar facility in the prior month, the calculation used to arrive at the total value of the bill credit and the amount of the bill credit applied to each subscriber.(b) Application of bill credit.--An electric distribution company shall apply a bill credit to a subscriber's next monthly electric bill for the proportional output of a community solar facility attributable to the subscriber. Excess credits on a 20250HB1155PN1279 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subscriber's bill shall roll over from month to month. An electric distribution company shall automatically apply excess credits to the final electric bill when a subscription is terminated for any cause.(c) Transferability.--An electric distribution company shall permit the transferability and portability of subscriptions if a subscriber relocates within the same electric distribution company territory.Section 8. Compensation and cost recovery for electric distribution companies.(a) Compensation.--A community solar organization shall compensate an electric distribution company for the electric distribution company's reasonable costs of interconnection of a community solar facility.(b) Cost recovery.--An electric distribution company may recover reasonable administrative costs from each subscriber organization, subject to approval by the commission, to administer a community solar program within the electric distribution company's service territory of a community solar facility. The Commonwealth shall maximize Federal and State funds for energy assistance, clean energy deployment or any other applicable funding to minimize the cost recovery impact on each subscriber.Section 9. Interconnection standards for community solar facilities.(a) Applications.--Beginning on the effective date of this subsection, an electric distribution company shall have the following duties:(1) Accept interconnection applications for community solar facilities on a nondiscriminatory basis and study the 20250HB1155PN1279 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 impact of interconnecting the facilities to the grid using the current commission-approved interconnection rules and tariffs and in accordance with best practices.(2) Include, in an interconnection application for a community solar facility, proof of site control by the community solar facility for the purposes of the study under paragraph (1).(b) Administrative fees.--The commission may impose an administrative fee on an initial interconnection application for community solar facilities under subsection (a). The commission may impose a fee equivalent to up to 5% of the electric distribution company's initial interconnection application fee. The commission may use fees collected under this subsection for the administrative costs directly associated with this act.Section 10. Unsubscribed energy.An electric distribution company shall purchase unsubscribed energy from a community solar facility at the electric distribution company's wholesale energy cost as determined by the commission. To offset real or perceived costs, an electric distribution company shall sell unsubscribed energy to PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., regional transmission organization or its successor service territory markets or otherwise decrease energy purchases.Section 11. Customer participation in community solar programs.(a) Participation in programs.--The commission shall promulgate permanent regulations to enable participation in community solar programs by each customer class and economic group in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth, within 365 days of the effective date of this subsection.(b) Temporary regulations.--In order to facilitate the 20250HB1155PN1279 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prompt implementation of this section, the commission and department may promulgate temporary regulations. The temporary regulations shall be implemented within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection and expire following the date of publication of the permanent regulations under subsection (a) in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The temporary regulations shall not be subject to any of the following:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) Expiration.--The authority of the commission and department to promulgate temporary regulations under subsection (b) shall not expire until the commission promulgates the permanent regulations under subsection (a).(d) Contents.--The temporary regulations under subsection (b) shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) Be based on consideration of formal and informal input from all stakeholders.(2) Establish requirements that ensure access to programs and equitable opportunities for participation for residential and small commercial customer classes.(3) Establish a registration process for community solar organizations.20250HB1155PN1279 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Address the reasonable enforcement of minimum subscription requirements for a community solar facility.(e) Low-income customers.--The commission, in collaboration with the Office of Consumer Advocate, electric distribution companies, community solar organizations and low-income stakeholders, may promulgate regulations adopting mechanisms to increase participation by low-income customers in community solar programs. The commission shall increase participation by low-income customers in community solar programs in a manner that allows the commission to use available Federal funds to do all of the following:(1) Deliver larger guaranteed savings to income- qualified households than those households that would receive guaranteed savings without the Federal funds.(2) Maximize State energy assistance programs.Section 12. Location of multiple community solar facilities.The commission shall promulgate regulations establishing limitations on the location of multiple community solar facilities in close proximity. The regulations shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) Prohibit an entity or affiliated entity under common control from developing, owning or operating more than one community solar facility on the same parcel or contiguous parcels of land.(2) Authorize a brownfield or rooftop community solar facility to be sited on contiguous parcels if the total brownfield or rooftop community solar facility capacity on all contiguous parcels does not exceed the limits established by the commission.Section 13. Prevailing wage and labor requirements.20250HB1155PN1279 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Prevailing wage.--A community solar facility for which a bill credit is sought and awarded to a subscriber under this act shall be deemed to meet each of the minimum requirements necessary to apply the wage and benefit rates and related certification of payroll records required under the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act. A community solar organization and each of the organization's agents, contractors and subcontractors shall comply with the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act as attested under section 5 for work undertaken at the community solar facility in which a bill credit for a subscriber is sought and awarded.(b) Solar energy projects.--Any contractor, subcontractor or worker performing construction, reconstruction, demolition, repair or maintenance work on a solar energy project funded under this act shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Maintain all valid licenses, registrations or certificates required by the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or a local government entity that is necessary to do business or perform applicable work.(2) Maintain compliance with the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, and bonding and liability insurance requirements as specified in the contract for the solar energy project.(3) Has not defaulted on a project, declared bankruptcy, been debarred or suspended on a project by the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or a local government entity within the previous three years.(4) Has not been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony 20250HB1155PN1279 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relating to the performance or operation of the business of the contractor or subcontractor within the previous 10 years.(5) Has completed a minimum of the United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration's 10-hour safety training course or similar training sufficient to prepare workers for any hazards that may be encountered during their work.(c) Violations.--The Department of Labor and Industry shall enforce this section in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth. The Department of Labor and Industry shall apply the same administration and enforcement applicable under the requirements of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act to ensure compliance with subsection (a). In addition to enforcement authorized under the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, if the Department of Labor and Industry determines that the community solar organization intentionally failed to pay prevailing wage rates or benefit rates in violation of section 11(h) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act for work specified under subsection (a), the community solar organization or the organization's agents, contractors and subcontractors shall pay a fine equivalent to 10% of the value of the bill credit multiplied by the estimated 25-year production of the community solar facility.Section 14. Ratepayer protections.This act shall minimize direct or indirect costs related to community solar facilities to ratepayers of an electric distribution company that are not subscribers. The commission shall maximize benefits to all rate classes, regardless of participation in a community solar program.Section 15. Effective date.20250HB1155PN1279 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1155PN1279 - 17 - 1